Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 8
CHILDREN AND YOUTH BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-195, see section 1 of chapter 190, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-801. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

In order to provide quality behavioral health services to families of children and youth with behavioral health challenges, behavioral health services should be coordinated among state departments and political subdivisions of the state and should be culturally competent, cost-effective, and provided in the least restrictive settings;

The behavioral health system and child- and youth-serving agencies are often constrained by resource capacity and systemic barriers that can create difficulties in providing appropriate and cost-effective interventions and services for children and youth;

Children and youth with behavioral health challenges may require a multi-system level of care that can lead to duplication and fragmentation of services. To avoid these problems, keep families together, and support caregivers during a child's or youth's behavioral health challenge, departments and political subdivisions of the state must collaborate with one another.

The Colorado state innovation model, an initiative housed in the office of the governor, has worked to integrate behavioral health and physical health, has made significant progress advancing the use of alternative payment models, and has created infrastructure for screening and innovative payment reforms. However, future work is needed to further expand and improve integrated services for children and families, with a focus on early and upstream interventions.

The general assembly further finds and declares that, building upon work completed by Colorado's trauma-informed system of care, Colorado must implement a model of comprehensive system of care for families of children and youth with behavioral health challenges.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2098, § 2, effective August 2.

25.5-5-802. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"At risk of out-of-home placement" means a child or youth who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5 and the child or youth:

Has been diagnosed as having a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102 (11.5), or a behavioral health disorder; and

May require a level of care that is provided in a residential child care facility, inpatient psychiatric hospital, or other intensive care setting outside of the child's or youth's home. "At risk of out-of-home placement" includes a child or youth who:

Is entering the division of youth services; or

Is at risk of child welfare involvement.

"Behavioral health disorder" means a substance use disorder, mental health disorder, or one or more substantial disorders of the cognitive, volitional, or emotional processes that grossly impair judgment or capacity to recognize reality or to control behavior, including serious emotional disturbances. "Behavioral health disorder" also includes those mental health disorders listed in the most recent versions of the diagnostic statistical manual of mental health disorders, the diagnostic classification of mental health and developmental disorders of infancy and early childhood, and the international statistical classification of diseases and related health problems.

"Behavioral health services" or "behavioral health system" means the child and youth service system that encompasses prevention and promotion of emotional health, prevention and treatment services for mental health and substance use conditions, and recovery support.

"Child and youth" means a person who is twenty-six years of age or younger.

"Managed care entity" means an entity that enters into a contract to provide services in the statewide managed care system pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5.

"Mental health professional" means an individual licensed as a mental health professional pursuant to article 245 of title 12 or a professional person as defined in section 27-65-102 (17).

"Out-of-home placement" means a child or youth who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5 and the child or youth:

Has been diagnosed as having a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102 (11.5), or a behavioral health disorder; and

May require a level of care that is provided in a residential child care facility, inpatient psychiatric hospital, or other intensive care setting outside of the child's or youth's home. "Out-of-home placement" includes a child or youth who:

Has entered the division of youth services; or

Is at risk of child welfare involvement.

"Wraparound" means a high-fidelity, individualized, family-centered, strengths-based, and intensive care planning and management process used in the delivery of behavioral health services for a child or youth with a behavioral health disorder, commonly utilized as part of the system of care framework.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2098, § 2, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 8, see § 25.5-4-103.

25.5-5-803. High-fidelity wraparound services for children and youth - federal approval - reporting.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department shall seek federal authorization from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to provide wraparound services for eligible children and youth who are at risk of out-of-home placement or in an out-of-home placement. Prior to seeking federal authorization, the state department shall seek input from relevant stakeholders including counties, managed care entities participating in the statewide managed care system, families of children and youth with behavioral health disorders, communities that have previously implemented wraparound services, mental health professionals, the behavioral health administration and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services, and other relevant departments. The state department shall consider tiered care coordination as an approach when developing the wraparound model.

Upon federal authorization, and subject to available appropriations, the state department shall require managed care entities to implement wraparound services, which may be contracted out to a third party. Subject to available appropriations, the state department shall contract with the department of human services and the behavioral health administration in the department of human services to ensure care coordinators and those responsible for implementing wraparound services have adequate training and resources to support children and youth who may have co-occurring diagnoses, including behavioral health disorders and physical or intellectual or developmental disabilities. Attention must also be given to the geographic diversity of the state in designing this program in rural communities.

Upon implementation of the wraparound services, the state department, the department of human services, and the behavioral health administration in the department of human services shall monitor and report the annual cost savings associated with eligible children and youth receiving wraparound services to the public through the annual hearing, pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2. The state department shall require managed care entities to report data on the utilization and effectiveness of wraparound services.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department shall work collaboratively with the department of human services, the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, counties, and other departments, as appropriate, to develop and implement wraparound services for children and youth at risk of out-of-home placement or in an out-of-home placement. The behavioral health administration in the department of human services shall oversee that the wraparound services are delivered with fidelity to the model. As part of routine collaboration, and subject to available appropriations, the state department shall develop a model of sustainable funding for wraparound services in consultation with the department of human services and the behavioral health administration in the department of human services. Wraparound services provided to eligible children and youth pursuant to this section must be covered under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5, subject to available appropriations. The state department may use targeting criteria to ramp up wraparound services as service capacity increases, or temporarily, as necessary, to meet certain federal financial participation requirements.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2100, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, (HB 20-1384), ch. 172, p. 789, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1516, § 77, effective July 1.

25.5-5-804. Integrated funding pilot.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department, in conjunction with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, counties, and other relevant departments, shall design and recommend a child and youth behavioral health delivery system pilot program that addresses the challenges of fragmentation and duplication of behavioral health services. The pilot program shall integrate funding for behavioral health intervention and treatment services across the state to serve children and youth with behavioral health disorders. To implement the provisions of this section, the state department shall collaborate with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services and other relevant stakeholders, including counties, managed care entities, and families.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2101, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1384), ch. 172, p. 790, § 3, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1517, § 78, effective July 1.